Utah statutes.
48-2a-605 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from the limited partnership in any form other than cash.  Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which he shares in distributions from the limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

